Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-4] Communication between courts.
(a) A court of the State of Hawaii may communicate with a court in another
state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter. Either court may
allow the parties to participate in the communication. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (b), the court shall make a record of the
communication. The record may be limited to the fact that the communication
occurred.

(b) Courts may communicate concerning
schedules, calendars, court records, and other administrative matters without
making a record. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next